California statutes. Insurance Code
Offenses under this code, or under other laws relating to insurers, shall be prosecuted and tried in all respects as provided in the Penal Code for public offenses. For the purpose of evidence the commissioner shall furnish to any district attorney, without cost to the county, certified copies of any papers or records of the office of the commissioner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12931.

(a) Service of legal process, notices, or other papers described in or referred to by Section 1452, 1605, 1610, 1612, 11104, or 11105 may be made upon the commissioner in the instances enumerated in this section and under the circumstances prescribed in this section by delivering to the commissioner, the commissioner’s deputy, or the commissioner’s designated agent for service of process two copies thereof for each person or party defendant so served accompanied by payment of a substituted service fee as determined pursuant to Section 12978 for each person or party, and by complying with the other provisions of this section.

(b) The situations under which such service may be
 so made and the circumstances under which these provisions apply are:

(1) Where for any reason the person desiring to have service so made elects to serve the commissioner instead of the attorney in fact, as stipulated pursuant to Section 1323, of a reciprocal or interinsurance exchange, domestic, foreign, admitted, or nonadmitted.

(2) Where service is to be made on an admitted foreign or alien insurer, when service cannot be made on the principal statutory agent of such insurer duly appointed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1600) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 1 for reasons specified in Section 1604 or otherwise recognized by law.

(3) In actions against nonadmitted insurers, including nonadmitted
 fraternal benefit societies and reciprocals, under the circumstances described in Article 4 (commencing with Section 1610) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 1. This provision shall not apply to actions brought under insurance policies or certificates issued by nonadmitted insurers placed by surplus line brokers or special lines surplus line brokers where such insurance contract names a resident of this state as agent for service of process.

(4) In actions involving admitted and formerly admitted fraternal benefit societies as described in Section 11104.

(c) Upon receipt of two copies of the process, notice, or papers to be served and the fee above prescribed, the commissioner shall promptly mail one of the copies by certified mail (or by registered mail if it is addressed to an area
 outside of the United States where certified mail service is not available) to the defendant or person to be served at the last principal place of business of the defendant or person to be served, known to the commissioner by the commissioner’s official records in the case of a licensee; otherwise, in the case of a nonadmitted insurer, to its last principal place of business known to the commissioner from national directories or
 reference books or other reliable information available in the commissioner’s office. The commissioner shall keep a record of all services made upon the commissioner pursuant to this section. The other copy of the process, notice, or papers shall be retained among the commissioner’s official public records for a period not to exceed two years, absent special circumstances which in the commissioner’s judgment compel longer retention.

(d) Service made in the manner provided for in this section is valid and sufficient and gives jurisdiction over the person of a nonadmitted or unauthorized defendant, provided notice of such service and a copy of the process, notice, or papers being served are sent within 10 days thereafter by certified mail (or by registered mail if it is addressed to an area outside of the United States where certified
 mail service is not available) by plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney to the defendant at its last known principal place of business, and the receipt or the receipt of defendant’s agent for such copy, showing the name of the sender and the name and address of the addressee-defendant thereon, and the affidavit of plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney showing compliance with this section, are filed with the clerk of the court in which such action is pending on or before the date the defendant is required to appear, or within further time as the court may allow.

In case of service made pursuant to this section upon a licensee of the commissioner required by law to keep the licensee’s current business address or that of its agent for service of process on file with the commissioner, the service shall be valid if the commissioner mailed, postage prepaid, a copy of the
 process, notice, or papers to the defendant or licensee intended to be served to the licensee’s current address as shown by the commissioner’s records, or, in the case of an insurer, to its manager, president, or secretary, and an affidavit of compliance by plaintiff or plaintiff’s attorney at law is made and filed at the place and within the time mentioned in this subdivision.

(e) A plaintiff or complainant shall not be entitled to a judgment by default in any action, suit, or proceeding in which service of process is effected in the manner provided in this section until the expiration of 30 days from the date on which the affidavit of compliance is filed.

(f) This section does not limit or abridge the right to serve any process, notice, papers, or demand upon any insurer in
 any other manner now or hereafter permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 444, Sec. 8.   (SB 577)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

12935.

(a) The commissioner, by January 1, 1997, shall develop and make available to the general public, in the two most common non-English languages spoken in the state, which are Spanish and Vietnamese, informational sheets that provide a general explanation in those languages, of the terms most commonly used in passenger automobile and pickup truck liability insurance policies.

(b) These informational sheets are intended to provide only the general explanation of these insurance terms, and in the case of a dispute between an insurer and an insured, the policy as written in English will prevail. The development of informational sheets or the use of these informational sheets by insureds, insurers, agents, brokers, or the state shall not be interpreted as creating a duty or obligation to provide additional information or insurance policies in a non-English language.

(c) An informational sheet developed by the commissioner shall include a disclaimer, prominently displayed in 24-point type print at the beginning of the informational sheet, in the non-English language, that contains all of the following information:

(1) The informational sheet is for informational purposes only.

(2) The actual terms of an insurance policy prevail over the information provided in the informational sheet.

(3) In the case of a dispute, the insurance policy is controlling and a court will rely on the policy as it is written in English to resolve the dispute.

(4) The policy is the sole source of rights and obligations of the insurer and the insured.

(5) The information contained in the informational sheets does not create rights or obligations on the part of the insured, the insurer, the agent, the broker, or the state.

(6) The informational sheet is not intended to be a substitute for the actual policy written in English.

(d) The commissioner may develop informational sheets regarding other forms of insurance.

(e) The commissioner may develop informational sheets in foreign languages, other than Spanish and Vietnamese, as needed.

(f) Once developed by the commissioner, he or she may produce public service announcements concerning the availability of these informational sheets, to be utilized in those communities that the commissioner deems would benefit from the information.

(g) This section does not prevent an insurer or licensee from advertising an insurance policy, or the availability of a foreign language informational sheet, or the availability of a translation of an insurance policy, in a language other than English if the advertisement clearly states that the insurance policy is only available in English. However, in the case of a dispute, the insurance policy is controlling and any of those advertisements for insurance policies, informational sheets, or translations shall not be construed to modify or change the insurance policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 909, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12936.

(a) (1) Escheated funds deposited in the Insurance Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1523 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be transferred to the General Fund on June 30, 1998, to repay the principal and interest on the General Fund loan provided pursuant to Item 0845-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 1996, and such funds are hereby continuously appropriated for that purpose.

(2) If the Director of Finance determines that funds subject to escheat for the 1997–98 fiscal year are insufficient to repay the General Fund loan plus the interest owed, funds subject to escheat in the 1998–99 fiscal year, up to the amount necessary to repay the General Fund loan plus the interest owed, shall be available for expenditure by the commissioner to repay the principal and interest on the General Fund loan. Notwithstanding the loan repayment date specified in Item 0845-001-0001 of the Budget Act of 1996, such a determination by the Director of Finance shall trigger an extension of the loan repayment date to June 30, 1999.

(b) A policyholder who was entitled to a rebate pursuant to settlement or order of the commissioner and who has not received the escheated rebate may submit a claim to the Controller. The Controller shall pay the claim from among the Proposition 103 refunds that have escheated to the state and been deposited in the Unclaimed Property Fund upon verification that the claim is valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 963, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12937.

(a) Escheated funds deposited in the Insurance Fund pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1517 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be available for expenditure by the commissioner to fund proceedings and to pay expenses on nonasseted estates for which liabilities have been or will be incurred.

(b) A policyholder who was entitled to funds described in subdivision (a) pursuant to an order of distribution and who has not previously received an appropriate distribution may submit a claim to the commissioner. The commissioner shall pay the claim from the escheated funds deposited in the Insurance Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) upon verification that the claim is valid.

(c) The department shall not be required to conduct outreach programs to attempt to locate policyholders described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 187, Sec. 5.   Effective July 19, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12938.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall make available for public inspection and publish on its Internet Web site all of the information described in subdivisions (a) and (b). This information shall be maintained in a current, up-to-date condition. All identifying and privileged information regarding individual policyholders shall be redacted from documents available for public inspection and on the Internet Web site.

(a) All fully executed stipulations, orders, decisions, settlements, or other forms of agreement resolving market conduct examinations, whether the examinations were finalized, terminated, or suspended, that pertain to unfair or deceptive practices in the business of
 insurance as defined in Section 790.03.

(b) (1) Every adopted report of a market conduct examination of unfair or deceptive practices in the business of insurance as defined in Section 790.03 that is adopted as filed, or as modified or corrected, by the commissioner pursuant to Section 734.1.

(2) The commissioner upon adopting the report shall transmit a copy of the report, either electronically or by certified United States mail, to a representative that the examined insurer designated by that insurer to receive the report, or in the case of an examination of more than one insurer in an insurer group, to a single representative of the group designated to receive the report on behalf of all examined insurers. Within 20 business days after the transmittal, the examined insurer may submit comments to the commissioner relating to the adopted report. The comments
 shall be in a form and length as provided by regulation.

(3) Twenty business days after the transmittal the commissioner shall publish on the department’s Internet Web site the adopted report and any comments submitted by the examined insurer unless a court of competent jurisdiction has stayed the publication of the report.

(c) This section may not be construed to require the disclosure of company workpapers or other company documents discovered during the course of an examination or any preliminary report of the examination, except as otherwise permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 411, Sec. 58.   (AB 1416)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. The California Community Development Financial Institution Tax Credit Program [12939. - 12939.2.]

12939.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) There are specialized financial institutions in California that are specifically dedicated to, and whose core purpose is to, provide financial products and services to people and communities underserved by traditional financial markets and to support renewable energy projects, energy efficiency improvements, economic development, and affordable housing in these communities. These community development financial institutions or CDFIs seek to bridge the growing gap that exists between the financial products and services, renewable energy generation, energy efficiency improvements, economic development, and affordable housing available to the
 economic mainstream and those offered to low-income people and communities, as well as the nonprofit institutions that serve them. In addition, they serve a critical role in addressing issues of poverty and access to credit in economically disadvantaged communities by providing services, including, but not limited to, credit counseling to consumers, financial literacy training, home ownership counseling, entrepreneurial education, and technical assistance to small business owners.

(b) These mission-driven financial institutions require additional capital in order to expand their ability to provide financial products and services, and to promote needed renewable energy generation projects, energy efficiency improvements, economic development, and affordable housing for low-income individuals and communities, and the businesses and nonprofit agencies that serve them. For example, some offer responsible alternatives to high-cost check-cashing
 services and payday lenders that have moved into low-income communities. Others help finance small businesses, affordable housing, and community services and facilities that, in turn, help stabilize low-income neighborhoods and alleviate poverty.

(c) In carrying out their mission, funding community development is given priority over providing high returns to investors.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide an incentive in the form of California tax credits to attract much needed additional private capital investments that would not otherwise be available to CDFIs without the benefit of such incentive. It is the expectation of the Legislature that CDFIs will leverage these new investment dollars for the direct benefit of economically disadvantaged communities and low-income people in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 418, Sec. 4.   (AB 1011)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12939.1.

(a) The department, California Organized Investment Network (COIN), or any successor thereof, shall require the CDFIs receiving tax credit investments pursuant to Sections 12209, 17053.57, and 23657 of the Revenue and Taxation Code to submit reports to the department, COIN, or any successor thereof, on their use of the program and may specify by notice to those CDFIs the form, content, and manner of the reports.

(b) Biennially the department, COIN, or any successor thereof, shall include in the report required by Section 12922, information on the CDFI tax credit program based on the reports submitted by the CDFIs pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) On or before December 31, 2010, the Legislative Analyst shall prepare an analysis, based upon data provided by the Franchise Tax Board, the Department of Insurance, and COIN, to the Legislative Analyst on or before September 30, 2010, of the tax credit investments provided for in Sections 12209, 17053.57, and 23657 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including, but not limited to, the credits’ fiscal impact, what programs, projects, and other uses were funded or carried out by the CDFIs that were supported in whole or in part by the tax credit investments, and the resulting benefits to economically disadvantaged communities and low income people in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 580, Sec. 1.   Effective September 28, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

12939.2.

(a) The commissioner may establish and appoint a California Organized Investment Network Advisory Board.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner of this state.

(2) “Board” means the California Organized Investment Network Advisory Board.

(3) “Licensed attorney” means an attorney who resides in this state who has successfully passed the California bar examination and has been admitted to practice in this state or has otherwise been licensed to practice law in this state by the State Bar of
 California.

(c) The board shall include the commissioner, or
 the commissioner’s designee, three executives in the insurance investment industry, and one volunteer from each of the following categories:

(1) A licensed attorney practicing insurance law.

(2) A member of the public, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(3) A member of the public, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(4) A member of a consumer advocacy group.

(5) An affordable housing practitioner.

(6) A local economic development practitioner.

(7) A member of a financial institution or a community
 development financial institution.

(8) A representative with experience seeking investments for
 underserved or low-to-moderate-income or rural communities.

(9) A representative with experience seeking investments that provide environmental benefits.

(d) The board shall elect, from among its members, a chair and vice chair.

(e) The term of each member shall be for two years.

(f) The board shall have all of the following powers and duties:

(1) To advise the California Organized Investment Network, or
 its successor, on the best methods to increase the level of insurance industry capital in safe and sound investments while providing fair returns to investors and social or economic benefits to underserved and low-to-moderate-income communities, as well as environmental benefits.

(2) To meet a minimum of three or more times per year, or as deemed necessary by the commissioner.

(3) To facilitate contacts among executives at insurance companies, community-based organizations, and community development financial institutions.

(4) To recommend programmatic guidelines, but not specific allocations of the tax credit amount, to the California Organized Investment Network program.

(g) The members of the board shall not receive compensation from the state for their services under this
 section, but, when called to attend a meeting of the board, may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the meeting.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 186, Sec. 4.   (AB 1099)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Review of Commissioner’s Acts [12940. - 12940.]

12940.

The acts and orders of the commissioner are subject to such review, or other action by a court of competent jurisdiction, as is permitted or authorized by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procuring Information on Policies [12950. - 12960.]

12950.

Any person interested as owner, assignee, pledgee or payee, of any policy and desiring any information about such policy, may apply to the commissioner for a certificate of the facts or information desired. Such application, filed in duplicate, shall be accompanied by an affidavit, in duplicate, showing his interest in the policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

12951.

If the records of his office show the facts or information desired, the commissioner shall prepare his certificate reciting such facts or information. If his records do not show the facts or information desired, he may deliver or mail by certified mail an order to the insurer, directing it to state such information or facts in an affidavit and deliver such affidavit to him. If such insurer is a foreign insurer, the commissioner may deliver or mail by certified mail such order to its agent for service of process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

12952.

In such affidavit the insurer shall make a full, true and correct statement of all the desired facts and information in its possession, regardless of the location of its record of such information.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12953.

If such insurer neglects or refuses to make and deliver such affidavit to the commissioner within ninety days from the date of the delivery of the order by the commissioner to it or its agent for service of process, the commissioner shall revoke the certificate of authority of the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12954.

Immediately after receiving such affidavit from an insurer the commissioner shall certify such affidavit to the applicant. Such affidavit so certified by the commissioner shall be delivered to the applicant personally or by depositing it in the United States post office, addressed to the applicant, with postage prepaid thereon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12955.

If a loss is sustained under a policy of insurance and such policy has been lost or destroyed, all rights of every kind and nature, the time for the presentation of notice of loss, and the time for the presentation of proof of loss are stayed from the date such applicant delivers to the commissioner the affidavit showing his interest until and after five days after the date of the delivery by the commissioner to the applicant of the affidavit furnished by the insurer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

12956.

Forms of policies filed with the commissioner and writings in respect thereto shall be open to public inspection except where, in his judgment, the public welfare or the welfare of any insurer demands that any portion thereof be not made public. In such cases he may withhold such information from public inspection for such time as in his judgment is necessary or advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1937, Ch. 724.)
-------------------------------------------

12957.

The commissioner shall not withdraw approval of a previously approved policy, except upon those grounds as, in the commissioner’s opinion, would authorize disapproval upon original submission thereof. Any withdrawal of approval shall be in writing and shall specify the ground thereof. If the insurer demands a hearing on a withdrawal, the hearing shall be granted and commenced within 30 days of the filing of a written demand with the commissioner. Unless the hearing is commenced, the notice of withdrawal shall become ineffective upon the 31st day from and after the date of filing of the demand.

This section shall not apply to policies subject to the provisions of subdivision (f) of Section 10291.5, or to policies, contracts, or agreements that were approved under an alternative filing and approval procedure as
 provided for in subdivision (f) of Section 10506.4 or subdivision (c) of Section 10507.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 255.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12959.

(a) On January 1, 1990, and on every January 1, thereafter, the commissioner shall publish and distribute a comparison of insurance rates report for those lines of insurance which, in the comissioner’s judgment, are of most interest to individual purchasers of personal lines of coverage. The report shall be available to consumers. The distribution shall be designed to make consumers throughout the state aware of the content of the report. This report shall be prepared by the commissioner in a manner designed to provide information useful to consumers so that they may make informed comparisons of coverages and rates.

(b) The submission of any false rate information by any such insurer pursuant to a request of the commissioner for the purpose of compiling comparative data for the report to be published as required in subdivision (a), shall be punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Any person subject to regulation by the commissioner pursuant to this code that fails to comply with a data call required by the department pursuant to this section shall be liable to the state for a civil penalty in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each 30-day period that the person is not in compliance, unless the failure to comply is willful, in which case the civil penalty shall be in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period that the person is not in compliance, but not to exceed an aggregate amount of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In determining the level of the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the good faith of the insurer and any similar prior violations by the insurer under this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1076, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

12960.

The commissioner shall, by February 1, 2023, distribute a bulletin soliciting rate applications from insurers to account for the change to the financial responsibility law in Division 7 (commencing with Section 16000) of the Vehicle Code that will go into operation on January 1, 2025, and require the applications to be submitted by July 1, 2023. A rate change shall only go into effect on or after January 1, 2025, the operative date of the change in the financial responsibility law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (SB 1107)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Reporting [12962. - 12969.]

12962.

The commissioner shall report to the Governor, the Legislature, and to the committees of the Senate and Assembly having jurisdiction over insurance all of the following in the annual report submitted pursuant to Section 12922:

(a) An analysis of the information required by Sections 674.5, 1857.7, 1857.9, and 12963, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) An aggregate and an average for all insurers for each item of information required by these sections.

(2) The number of insurers reporting policies written for each class during the calendar year.

(3) For each class, the number of insurers reporting a combined loss ratio of 100 percent or more, and the number reporting a combined loss ratio of under 100 percent.

(4) An analysis of adjustments made to loss reserves for prior years.

(5) The change in any item required to be included by paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, from the immediately prior year.

(b) An analysis of the activities of the department in implementing the provisions of Proposition 103 on the November 8, 1988, general election ballot, as set forth in Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(c) Recommendations and proposals, including suggested legislation, to protect consumers from arbitrary insurance rates and practices, to
 encourage a competitive insurance marketplace, to provide for an accountable commissioner, and to ensure that insurance is fair, available, and affordable for all Californians.

(d) The requirements of this section shall be satisfied if the analysis required by this section is included in the annual report to the Governor required by Section 12922, and a copy of that report is provided to the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 786, Sec. 44.   (AB 2303)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

12963.

Each insurer transacting insurance, as defined in Sections 108 and 116, covering liability for any public entity, as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code, where the public entity is the named insured, shall report specified data to the commissioner by type of claim, upon request of the commissioner, which may, for a specified period, include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) The total number of insureds.

(b) The total amount of premiums received from insureds, both written and earned.

(c) The number of claims reported to the insurer and the number of claims reported closed.

(d) The total number of claims outstanding, together with the monetary amount reserved for loss and allocated loss expense.

(e) The number of claims closed with payment to the claimant, the total monetary amount paid thereon, and the total allocated loss expense paid thereon.

(f) The monetary amount paid on claims with allocated loss expense paid.

(g) The number of claims closed without payment to the claimant and the allocated loss expense paid thereon.

(h) The monetary amount reserved on claims incurred but not reported to the insurer.

(i) The number of lawsuits filed against the insurers insureds.

(j) A distribution by size of payment for those claims closed showing the number of claims and total amount paid for each monetary category, as determined by the commissioner.

As used in this section, the type of claims to be reported shall include, but not be limited to, workers’ compensation, liability, personal injury other than automobile, property damage other than automobile liability, liability based upon the dangerous condition of public property, and other general liability claims.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 586, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12965.

The data and other information required to be filed or reported under this article may be transmitted by electronic media or data transmision to the receiver’s electronic data processing system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1110, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12967.

(a) (1) The department shall develop and implement a coordinated approach to gather, review, and analyze the archives of insurers and other archives and records, using onsite teams and the oversight committee, to provide for research and investigation into insurance policies, unpaid insurance claims, and related matters of victims of the Holocaust or of the Nazi-controlled German government or its allies, and the beneficiaries and heirs of those victims, and for losses arising from the activities of the Nazi-controlled German government or its allies for insurance policies issued before and during World War II by insurers who have affiliates or subsidiaries authorized to do business in California. Information compiled shall be placed in a centralized database for the retention of policy and claimant data,
 and the data shall be used to implement this section and Section 790.15.

(2) The department has an affirmative duty to play an independent role in representing the interests of Holocaust survivors where necessary, including the duty to carry out research, investigations, and advocacy. The department shall cooperate with, participate in, promote coordination with, and to the extent feasible and consistent with the purposes of this section, work jointly with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and the international commission on Holocaust survivor claims or any other entity involved in the documentation, resolution, settlement, or distribution of insurance claims, including the documentation of unpaid claims and the distribution of proceeds, and the establishment and maintenance of a database to contain information relevant to claimants and documents and historical information. The department shall work to recover information and
 records that will strengthen the claims of California residents.

(3) The department shall employ insurance archaeologists, economists, attorneys, accountants, and other specialists, in this country and in Europe, to implement this section. The department shall work jointly with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and other organizations for this purpose. The department’s cooperation with other states shall be for the purpose of advancing survivors’ claims while avoiding duplication of efforts, and shall be dependent upon contributions by other states.

(4) In order to ensure that Holocaust survivors receive the most aggressive and independent representation possible in pursuit of their historic claims, in contracting with accounting firms, law firms, economists, or others to implement this section, the department shall, to the maximum extent possible, avoid any
 potential or actual conflict of interest by doing the following:

(A) Seek and give preference to firms that are entirely free of any associations with firms representing insurers and nations from which Holocaust survivors are seeking just treatment of their claims.

(B) If the department finds that it is necessary to contract with a firm or firms that have conflicts or potential conflicts of interest, those conflicts or potential conflicts of interest shall be disclosed to the commissioner, and the following requirements shall apply:

(i) The contract shall contain a provision that expresses a formal commitment on the part of the firm to aggressively pursue a maximum just settlement for Holocaust survivors and their families without regard to any adverse impacts on insurers, affiliates of insurers, nations, or others
 that may have employed the firm or affiliates of the firm that is contracting with the commissioner to assist in carrying out the commissioner’s responsibilities under this section.

(ii) If any conflict or potential conflict exists between the firm, or an affiliate of the firm, and an insurer, an affiliate of an insurer, a nation or others directly or indirectly involving Holocaust claims, the firm shall disclose both the fact of the conflict or potential conflict, and all relevant information describing the nature of the conflict or potential conflict.

(iii) If a conflict or potential conflict exists between the firm, or an affiliate of the firm, and an insurer, an affiliate of an insurer, a nation, or others that does not directly or indirectly involve Holocaust claims, the firm shall disclose the fact of the conflict or potential conflict and identify the source of the conflict
 or potential conflict, but need not describe the particular circumstances or facts that create the conflict or potential conflict.

(C) The department may take whatever special measures it deems necessary to avoid either the appearance or the reality of conflicts that may undermine public confidence in the integrity of the effort to secure justice for Holocaust survivors.

(b) The funding of the activities provided for by this section for the 1998–99 fiscal year shall be from funds transferred pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1523 of the Code of Civil Procedure, which funds are hereby appropriated to the commissioner for that purpose. The commissioner shall seek reimbursement of those funds as provided in subdivision (c).

Funding for subsequent fiscal years shall be subject to the Budget Act and based on a plan submitted by the
 commissioner to the Legislature outlining the plan for reimbursement of expenses of the department by affected insurers.

Funds made available to implement this section shall be used to develop and implement a coordinated approach to gather, review, and analyze the archives of affected insurance groups, and other archives and records, using onsite teams and the oversight committee. These funds shall also be used to fund the necessary expenses of the Holocaust Era Insurance Claims Oversight Committee established in subdivision (d). The information compiled shall be placed in a centralized database for the retention of policy and claimant data, and that data shall be used by the department to implement this section.

(c) (1) Any funds recovered by the department for the purpose of reimbursing the state for costs associated with investigation and enforcement actions under this section
 shall not be deposited in the Insurance Fund, but instead shall be delivered to the Controller for deposit into the General Fund.

(2) To the maximum extent possible, the department shall seek reimbursement for its costs incurred in implementing this section, including funds transferred pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1523 of the Code of Civil Procedure, from any settlements reached with affected insurers.

(d) (1) There is established a seven-member Holocaust Era Insurance Claims Oversight Committee, that shall be known as the oversight committee, and whose members shall be appointed as follows:

(A) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor.

(B) One member shall be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the
 Senate.

(C) One member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(D) One member shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Insurance.

(2) The Governor shall designate one of the Governor’s appointees as the chairperson of the committee.

(3) Each member of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the authority that appointed the member to serve on the committee.

(4) The oversight committee shall be composed of qualified individuals with experience in Holocaust claims cases, similar investigations, archival research, and international law. The oversight committee shall also include Holocaust survivors. No member of the oversight committee shall have a potential or actual conflict
 of interest, or shall be employed by a person who has a potential or actual conflict of interest.

(5) The appointments shall be expedited because of the urgency due to survivors’ needs.

(6) The oversight committee shall have the following authority and shall do all of the following:
